Utah statutes.
58-53-301.   Licensure required--License classification.
(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of landscape architecture
except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-53-304.
(2)  The division shall issue a license under this chapter to a qualified
person in the classification of landscape architecture.
